en: Stuffed vegetables
de: Gefülltes Gemüse
fi: Täytetyt kasvikset
fr: Légumes farcis
hr: Punjeno povrće
lt: Įdarytos daržovės

en: Frozen stuffed vegetables
fr: Légumes farcis surgelés

en: Stuffed vegetables in oil
fr: Légumes farcis dans l'huile, légumes farcis à l'huile

en: Gratins
de: Gratins
fi: gratiinit
fr: Gratins
hr: Gratinirani
it: Alimenti al gratin, Alimenti gratinati
ja: グラタン
nl: Ovenschotels

en: Vegetable gratins, Oven grilled vegetables gratin
de: Gemüseaufläufe
fi: kasvisgratiinit
fr: Gratins de légumes, Gratin de légumes
hr: Gratinirano povrće
nl: Groente-ovenschotels

en: Frozen vegetable gratins
fr: Gratins de légumes surgelés

en: Vegetables au gratin in bechamel sauce, Oven grilled vegetables in bechamel sauce
fr: Gratin de légumes à la béchamel

en: Eggplant Gratin, Oven grilled eggplant gratin
de: Auberginenauflauf
fr: Gratins d'aubergine, Gratin d'aubergine
hr: Gratinirani patlidžan
nl: Aubergine-ovenschotels

en: Cauliflower gratins, Cauliflower au gratin, Oven grilled cauliflower
fr: Gratins de choux-fleurs, Gratins de chou-fleur
hr: Gratinirane cvjetače
nl: Bloemkool ovenschotel

en: Pasta gratin, Oven grilled pasta gratin
de: Nudelaufläufe
fr: Gratins de pâtes
hr: Gratinirana tjestenina
nl: Pasta ovenschotel

en: Potato gratin
de: Kartoffelgratin
fi: perunagratiini
fr: Gratins de pomme de terre, Gratin de pomme de terre, Gratin de pommes de terre
hr: Gratinirani krumpir
it: sformati di patate
nl: Aardappelovenschotels

en: Dauphiné-style creamed potatoes au gratin
fr: Gratins dauphinois, Gratin dauphinois, Pommes de terre au gratin

en: Tartiflettes, Tartiflette, Cheese fondue
fr: Tartiflettes, Tartiflette
hr: Tartiflettes
nl: Tartiflettes

en: Canned tartiflettes
fr: Tartiflettes en conserve
hr: Konzervirane tartiflettes
nl: Tartiflette in blik/pot

fr: Haricots préparés, Haricots cuisinés
nl: Kant-en-klaar bonen

en: Prepared lasagne, Prepared lasagna, Lasagnas
de: Fertiglasagnen
es: Lasaña preparada
fi: kypsä lasagne
fr: Lasagnes préparées
hr: Pripremljene lazanje
it: Lassagne pronte
lt: Paruoštos lazanijos
nl: Kant-en-klaar lasagnas
pl: Gotowa lasagne, Gotowa lazania
pt: Lasanha preparada

en: Vegetable lasagnas, Vegetable lasagne, Lasagna with vegetables
de: Gemüselasagne
es: Lasaña de verduras
fr: Lasagnes aux légumes
hr: Lazanje od povrća
it: Lasagna di verdure
lt: Lazanijos su daržovėmis
nl: Groentelasagnes, groentelasagna

en: Vegetarian lasagne
de: Vegetarische Lasagne
es: Lasaña vegetariana
fi: kasvislasagne
fr: Lasagnes végétariennes
hr: Vegetarijanske lazanje
it: Lasagne vegetariane
lt: Vegetariškos lazanijos
nl: Vegetarische lasagna

en: Lasagna with cooked vegetables
fr: Lasagnes aux légumes cuits
hr: Lazanje s kuhanim povrćem
lt: Lazanijos su keptomis daržovėmis

en: Lasagne with goat cheese and spinach, Lasagna with goat cheese and spinach
fr: Lasagnes au fromage de chèvre et épinards, Lasagne Chèvre Épinards, Lasagnes au fromage de chèvre et aux épinards, Lasagnes chèvre épinards, Lasagnes au fromage et aux épinards
hr: Lazanje s kozjim sirom i špinatom
it: Lasagne al formaggio di capra e spinaci
lt: Lazanijos su ožkų sūriu ir špinatais
nl: Lasagna met geitenkaas en spinazie